District of Columbia statutes.
10-509.04

Acceptance of collateral for appearance before United States Magistrate; deposit of collateral.

The officer on duty in command of those employees designated by the Mayor of the District of Columbia as provided in § 10-509.01 may accept deposit of collateral from any person charged with the violation of any rule or regulation prescribed under this subchapter, for appearance in court or before the appropriate United States Magistrate; and such collateral shall be deposited with the United States Magistrate sitting in the district where the offense has been committed.

History

July 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 488, ch. 508, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-133.
1973 Ed., § 9-137.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.